Maine, session 132, LD1940.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §4301, as amended by PL 2021, c. 590, Pt. A, §§3 to 5 and c.
754, §1, is further amended to read:
§4301. Definitions
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the following terms
have the following meanings.
1. Affordable housing. "Affordable housing" means a decent, safe and sanitary
dwelling, apartment or other living accommodation for a household whose income does
not exceed 80% of the median income for the area as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development under the United States Housing Act of
1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8, as amended. as follows:
F. Rental housing that a household whose income does not exceed 80% of the median
income for the area as defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban
Development under the United States Housing Act of 1937, Public Law 75-412, 50
Stat. 888, Section 8, as amended, can afford without spending more than 30% of the
household's monthly income on housing costs; and
G. With respect to housing that is owned, housing that a household whose income does
not exceed 120% of the median income for the area as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development under the United States Housing Act
of 1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8, as amended, can afford without
spending more than 30% of the household's monthly income on housing costs.
1-A. Cluster development. "Cluster development" means a form of development that
allows a subdivision design in which individual lot sizes and setbacks are reduced in
exchange for the creation of common open space and recreation areas, the preservation of
environmentally sensitive areas, agriculture and silviculture and the reduction in the size
of road and utility systems.
1-B. Age-friendly community. "Age-friendly community" means a community
where policies, services, settings and structures support and enable older people to actively
age in place and that recognizes the capabilities, resources and needs of older adults, plans
to meet the needs of older adults in flexible ways that support healthy and active aging,
promotes the inclusion and contributions of older adults in all areas of community life,
respects the self-determination and independence of older adults and protects those older
adults who are most vulnerable.
1-C. Accessory dwelling unit. "Accessory dwelling unit" means a self‑contained
dwelling unit located within, attached to or detached from a single-family dwelling unit
located on the same parcel of land.
1-D. Agricultural soils. "Agricultural soils" means farmland soils classified by the
United States Department of Agriculture, Natural Resources Conservation Service and
state soil and water conservation districts as prime farmland, unique farmland or farmland
of statewide or local importance.
1-E. Attainable housing. "Attainable housing" means a decent, safe and sanitary
dwelling or other living accommodation that a household whose income is greater than
80% and less than 120% of the median income for the area as defined by the United States
Page 1 - 132LR0289(01)

414 Department of Housing and Urban Development under the United States Housing Act of
425 1937, Public Law 75-412, 50 Stat. 888, Section 8, as amended, can afford without spending
436 more than 30% of the household's monthly income on housing costs.
2. Coastal area. "Coastal area" means a coastal island and any municipality or
unorganized township contiguous to tidal waters. The inland boundary of the coastal area
is the inland line of any coastal town line.
3. Comprehensive plan. "Comprehensive plan" means a document or interrelated
documents that are consistent with the goals established under subchapter 2 containing the
elements established under section 4326 4326-A, subsections 1 to 4, including the
strategies for an implementation program which are consistent with the goals and
guidelines established under subchapter II.
4. Conditional zoning. "Conditional zoning" means the process by which the
municipal legislative body may rezone property to permit the use of that property subject
to conditions not generally applicable to other properties similarly zoned.
4-A. Critical rural area. "Critical rural area" means a rural an area that is specifically
identified and designated by a municipality's or multimunicipal region's comprehensive
plan within a rural area as deserving maximum protection from development to preserve
natural resources and related economic activities that may include, but are not limited to,
significant farmland, forest land or mineral resources; high-value wildlife or fisheries
habitat; scenic areas; public water supplies; scarce or especially vulnerable natural
resources; flood buffer areas and flood-prone areas; and open lands functionally necessary
to support a vibrant rural economy.
4-B. Critical waterfront area. "Critical waterfront area" means a shorefront area
characterized by functionally water-dependent uses, as defined in Title 38, section 436‑A,
subsection 6, and specifically identified and designated by a municipality's or
multimunicipal region's comprehensive plan as deserving maximum protection from
incompatible development.
4-C. Conserved lands. "Conserved lands" means any natural or rural lands that are
protected from development through conservation easements, through ownership in fee by
a municipality, the State, the Federal Government or a land conservation organization or
through other mechanisms. "Conserved lands" includes lands under permanent fee or
conservation easement as identified by the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry in its inventory of conservation lands and includes natural and traditionally
managed lands identified in government-to-government relationships with the Wabanaki
Nations. "Conserved lands" does not include lands with temporary protections such as
lease agreements, shoreland or municipal land use restrictions, carbon offset projects or
enrollment in tree growth or open space current use tax law programs in Title 36, chapter
105, subchapters 2-A and 10, respectively.
4-D. Critical natural resources. "Critical natural resources" means:
A. Protected natural resources such as coastal sand dune systems, coastal wetlands,
fragile mountain areas, freshwater wetlands, great ponds, rivers, streams or brooks and
significant wildlife habitat as defined by Title 38, section 480-B, subsections 1, 2, 3, 4,
5, 9 and 10, respectively;
Page 2 - 132LR0289(01)

B. Habitats of threatened and endangered species and species of special concern as
designated and mapped under Title 12, chapter 925;
C. Significant freshwater fisheries spawning habitat as identified and mapped by the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife or the Department of Marine Resources;
D. Rare or exemplary natural communities as defined and mapped in the Natural Areas
Program under Title 12, section 544; and
E. Areas containing threatened or endangered plant species in the Natural Areas
Program under Title 12, section 544.
5. Contract zoning. "Contract zoning" means the process by which the property
owner, in consideration of the rezoning of that person's property, agrees to the imposition
of certain conditions or restrictions not imposed on other similarly zoned properties.
5-A. Downtown. "Downtown" means: the central business district of a community
that serves as the center for socioeconomic interaction in the community and is
characterized by a cohesive core of commercial and mixed-use buildings, often
interspersed with civic, religious and residential buildings and public spaces, typically
arranged along a main street and intersecting side streets, walkable and served by public
infrastructure.
A. The central business district of a community that serves as the center for
socioeconomic interaction in the community and is characterized by a cohesive core of
commercial and mixed-use buildings, often interspersed with civic, religious and
residential buildings and public spaces, typically arranged along a main street and
intersecting side streets, walkable and served by public infrastructure; or
B. An area identified as a downtown in a comprehensive plan adopted pursuant to
chapter 187, subchapter II.
5-B. Growth-related capital investment. "Growth-related capital investment"
means investment by the State in only the following projects, even if privately owned,
whether using state, federal or other public funds and whether in the form of a purchase,
lease, grant, loan, loan guarantee, credit, tax credit or other financial assistance:
A. Construction or acquisition of newly constructed multifamily rental housing;
B. Development and redevelopment of high-impact corridors and other designated
growth areas that provide an opportunity for mixed-use development consisting of
residential, light industrial or business parks uses;
C. Construction or, extension or upgrade of sewer, water and other utility lines to
support designated growth areas;
D. Grants and loans for public or quasi-public service infrastructure, public or quasi-
public facilities, bicycle and pedestrian infrastructure and community buildings; and
E. Construction or expansion of state office buildings, state courts, hospitals and other
quasi-public facilities and other civic buildings that serve public clients and customers.
"Growth-related capital investment" does not include investment in the following: the
operation or maintenance of a governmental or quasi-governmental facility or program; the
renovation of a governmental facility that does not significantly expand the facility's
capacity; general purpose aid for education; school construction or renovation projects;
Page 3 - 132LR0289(01)

413 highway or bridge projects; programs that provide direct financial assistance to individual
424 businesses; community revenue sharing; or public health programs.
5-C. Department. "Department" means the Department of Agriculture, Conservation
and Forestry Maine Office of Community Affairs under Title 5, section 3202.
5-D. Development standards. "Development standards" means performance and
design standards for buildings, streets, civic spaces and sites that promote a pattern of
development through the identification of characteristics unique to a placetype and to the
areas that make up a placetype. Development standards may include, but are not limited
to, street connectivity and design; location and design of civic spaces; building type, use,
form, placement, arrangement and orientation on a lot; location of parking; storm water
design; and other site design considerations.
6. Development. "Development" means a change in land use involving alteration of
the land, water or vegetation, or the addition or alteration of structures or other construction
not naturally occurring.
6-A. Impact fee. "Impact fee" means a charge or assessment imposed by a
municipality against a new development to fund or recoup a portion of the cost of new,
expanded or replacement infrastructure facilities necessitated by and attributable at least in
part to the new development.
6-B. Impact fee ordinance. "Impact fee ordinance" means an ordinance that
establishes the applicability, formula and means by which impact fees are assessed.
6-C. Growth area. "Growth area" means an area that is designated in a municipality's
or multimunicipal region's comprehensive plan as suitable for orderly residential,
commercial or industrial development, or any combinations of those types of development,
and into which most development projected over 10 years is directed a placetype or portion
of a placetype that has been identified by a municipality or multimunicipal region in a
comprehensive plan as an area for development and investment, including, but not limited
to, new roads, utilities and infrastructure expansion. "Growth area" includes high-impact
corridors.
6-D. High-impact corridor. "High-impact corridor" means a linear collection of
predominantly commercial parcels of developed land along a road located proximate to a
downtown or village center characterized by a low-density development pattern, with large
areas of parking typically located between buildings and the road.
7. Implementation program. "Implementation program" means that component of a
local growth management program that begins after the adoption of a comprehensive plan
and that includes the full range of municipal policy-making powers, including spending
and borrowing powers, as well as the powers to adopt or implement ordinances, codes,
rules or other land use regulations, tools or mechanisms that carry out the purposes and
general policy statements and strategies of the comprehensive plan in a manner consistent
with the goals and guidelines of subchapter 2.
7-A. Important natural resources. "Important natural resources" means those areas
in the community that are important for strategic conservation planning purposes and are
not classified as critical natural resources, including, but not limited to:
A. Large habitat blocks as identified by the Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife's beginning with habitat program;
Page 4 - 132LR0289(01)

B. Habitat connections as identified by the Department of Inland Fisheries and
Wildlife's beginning with habitat program;
C. Focus areas of statewide ecological significance as identified in the Department of
Inland Fisheries and Wildlife's federally required wildlife action plan;
D. Exemplary natural communities as defined by the Natural Areas Program under
Title 12, section 544;
E. Important water resources and associated riparian habitat as identified by the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife's beginning with habitat program; or
F. Barriers and potential barriers to aquatic organism passage as identified by the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife's beginning with habitat program.
For the purposes of this subsection, "beginning with habitat program" means the program
that consolidates wildlife and habitat information from public agencies and private
organizations in the State for use by municipalities and landowners.
8. Land use ordinance. "Land use ordinance" means an ordinance or regulation of
general application adopted by the municipal legislative body which controls, directs or
delineates allowable uses of land and the standards for those uses.
8-A. Local climate action plan. "Local climate action plan" means a planning and
decision-making document adopted by a municipality or multimunicipal region that:
A. Includes compiled information regarding climate and health risks;
B. Includes an evaluation of options for addressing climate and health risks by
individuals, committees or offices in local or regional government that are responsible
for planning, implementing and monitoring activities that reduce climate risk, build
resilience to natural hazards and improve health and community capacity to manage
crises; and
C. Is produced using community dialogue and participation in a manner that ensures
the input and needs of the community's most vulnerable citizens are elevated and
prioritized.
9. Growth management program. "Growth management program" means a
document containing the components described in section 4326 4326-A, subsections 1 to
4, including the implementation program, that is consistent with the goals and guidelines
established by subchapter II 2 and that regulates land use beyond that required by Title 38,
chapter 3, subchapter I 1, article 2‑B.
10. Planning committee. "Planning committee" means the committee established by
the municipal officers of a municipality or combination of municipalities multimunicipal
region that has the general responsibility established under sections 4324 and 4326 4326-A.
11. Moratorium. "Moratorium" means a land use ordinance or other regulation
approved by a municipal legislative body that, if necessary, may be adopted on an
emergency basis and given immediate effect and that temporarily defers all development,
or a type of development, by withholding any permit, authorization or approval necessary
for the specified type or types of development.
11-A. Multimunicipal region. "Multimunicipal region" means a region made up of
2 or more municipalities that work together to cooperatively establish a growth
Page 5 - 132LR0289(01)

413 management program or independent growth management programs that are unified with
424 respect to the implementation of the state goal identified in section 4312, subsection 3,
435 paragraph A A-1. The several municipalities in a multimunicipal region may establish the
446 region pursuant to section 4325 or chapter 115.
12. Municipal reviewing authority. "Municipal reviewing authority" means the
municipal planning board, agency or office, or if none, the municipal officers.
12-A. Placetype. "Placetype" means a definable geographic settlement pattern
identifiable by the type of activities that occur there and by a set of characteristics related
to its location, including the proximity and relationship to natural resources and rural areas;
the size of the developed area; the arrangement of buildings and their uses; the pattern and
arrangement of streets; the type of infrastructure available; and the presence of civic spaces
and civic buildings.
13-A. Rate of growth ordinance. "Rate of growth ordinance" means a land use
ordinance or other rule that limits the number of building or development permits issued
by a municipality or other jurisdiction over a designated time frame.
14. Regional council. "Regional council" means a regional planning commission or
a council of governments established under chapter 119, subchapter I 1.
14-A. Service center community. "Service center community" means a municipality
or group of municipalities identified by the department according to a methodology
established by rule that includes 4 basic criteria, including level of retail sales, jobs-to-
workers ratio, the amount of federally assisted housing and the volume of service sector
jobs. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in
Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
14-B. Rural area. "Rural area" means a geographic area that is identified and
designated in a municipality's or multimunicipal region's comprehensive plan as an area
that is deserving of some level of regulatory protection from unrestricted development for
purposes that may include, but are not limited to, supporting farmland and agriculture,
forest land and forestry, mineral resources and mining, open space, erosion mitigation,
water retention, wildlife habitat, fisheries habitat, flood buffer areas and flood-prone areas,
public water supplies, natural resources, open land and scenic lands, and away from which
most development projected over 10 years is diverted. Characteristics of a rural area may
include large tracts of open land, areas of conserved lands, working farms and forests and
a pattern of development that is spaced apart with dense vegetation or large, open,
undeveloped areas between buildings or groupings of buildings.
14-C. Transitional area. "Transitional area" means an area that is designated in a
municipality's or multimunicipal region's comprehensive plan as suitable for a share of
projected residential, commercial or industrial development but that is neither intended to
accept the amount or density of development appropriate for a growth area nor intended to
provide the level of protection for rural resources afforded in a rural area or critical rural
area.
14-D. Suburban area. "Suburban area" means a geographic area characterized by a
fragmented development pattern, typically segregated by use, that often occurs on formerly
rural land and where roadways are generally curvilinear and noncontiguous.
Page 6 - 132LR0289(01)

15-A. Zoning ordinance. "Zoning ordinance" means a type of land use ordinance
that divides a municipality into districts and that prescribes and reasonably applies different
regulations in each district.
Sec. 2. 30-A MRSA §4312, sub-§2, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 578, §8, is
repealed.
Sec. 3. 30-A MRSA §4312, sub-§2, ¶J is enacted to read:
J. Encourage cooperation between municipalities and state agencies, regional councils
established under chapter 119, subchapter 1 and nonprofit organizations to develop
comprehensive plans that assist municipalities in establishing local land use policies.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §4312, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2021, c. 657, §§1 to 4, is
further amended to read:
3. State goals. The Legislature hereby establishes a set of state goals to provide overall
direction and consistency to the planning and regulatory actions of all state and municipal
agencies affecting natural resource management, land use and development. The
Legislature declares that, in order to promote and protect the health, safety and welfare of
the citizens of the State, it is in the best interests of the State to achieve the following goals:
A. To encourage orderly growth and development in appropriate areas of each
community and region while protecting the State's rural character, making efficient use
of public services and preventing development sprawl;
A-1. To encourage municipalities and multimunicipal regions to focus new
development in growth areas to enable efficient use of public services and existing
infrastructure investments while protecting the State's rural character, working lands,
natural resources and natural resource-based industries and preventing development
sprawl and sprawl-associated traffic congestion;
B. To plan for, finance and develop an a safe and efficient system of public facilities,
transportation infrastructure and public services to accommodate anticipated growth
and economic development, including planning new development, factoring in
life-cycle costs and infrastructure maintenance and replacement;
C. To promote an economic climate which that increases job opportunities and overall
economic well-being;
D. To promote and work to ensure choice, economic diversity and affordability in
housing for low-income and moderate-income households and use housing policy to
remove barriers to housing production and to help address disparities in access to
educational, occupational and other opportunities;
D-1. To promote land use policies and land use ordinances that encourage the siting
and construction of attainable housing and affordable housing in reasonable proximity
to jobs and services and to site new housing in locations that decrease household
transportation costs and reduce traffic congestion on regional roadways;
E. To protect and improve the quality and to manage the quantity of the State's water
resources, including lakes, aquifers, great ponds, estuaries, rivers and coastal areas;
Page 7 - 132LR0289(01)

F. To protect the State's other critical natural resources and important natural
resources, including, without limitation, wetlands, wildlife and fisheries habitat, sand
dunes, shorelands, scenic vistas and unique natural areas;
G. To protect the State's marine resources industry, ports and harbors from
incompatible development and to promote access to the shore for commercial
fishermen persons who fish commercially and the public;
H. To safeguard the State's agricultural and forest resources from development which
that threatens those resources, including protecting forest soils, agricultural soils and
access to farmland and promoting the viability of agriculture, in addition to
safeguarding agricultural resources from development;
I. To preserve the State's historic and archeological resources;
J. To promote and protect the availability of outdoor recreation opportunities for all
Maine citizens, including access to surface waters;
L. To encourage municipalities to develop policies that accommodate older adults with
aging in place and that encourage, including the creation of age-friendly communities,
appropriate housing and transportation access; and
N. To plan for the effects of the rise in sea level natural hazards, including, but not
limited to, rising sea level, coastal and riverine flooding and extreme weather, on
buildings, transportation infrastructure, sewage treatment facilities and other relevant
state, regional, municipal or privately held infrastructure, property or resources., to
build resilience to natural hazards and to promote consistency with the state climate
action plan under Title 38, section 577; and
O. To develop local and regional coastal management policies that are consistent with
Title 38, section 1801 for any part of a municipality or multimunicipal region that is a
coastal area.
Sec. 5. 30-A MRSA §4314, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2003, c. 641, §2, is further
amended to read:
1. Comprehensive plan. A municipal comprehensive plan adopted or amended by a
municipality under former Title 30, chapter 239, subchapter 5 or 6 remains in effect until
amended or repealed in accordance with the procedures, goals and guidelines requirements
established in this subchapter. A comprehensive plan that is submitted to the department
for certification prior to the final adoption of rules initiated after July 1, 2026 must be
reviewed by the department based on provisions of this subchapter and associated rules in
effect as of January 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. 30-A MRSA §4314, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§16 and affected by §41, is repealed.
Sec. 7. 30-A MRSA §4314, sub-§3, ¶E, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c.
397, Pt. A, §31, is amended to read:
E. The ordinance or portion of the ordinance conflicts with a newly adopted
comprehensive plan or plan amendment adopted in accordance with the procedures,
goals and guidelines established in this subchapter, in which case the ordinance or
portion of the ordinance remains in effect for a period of up to 24 months immediately
following adoption of the comprehensive plan or plan amendment; or
Page 8 - 132LR0289(01)

Sec. 8. 30-A MRSA §4314, sub-§3, ¶F, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§16 and affected by §41, is repealed.
Sec. 9. 30-A MRSA §4324, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2001, c. 578, §13, is further
amended to read:
3. Citizen Public participation. In order to encourage citizen public participation in
the development of a growth management program, municipalities or multimunicipal
regions may adopt growth management programs only after establishing a process for
active public participation, soliciting and, considering and incorporating a broad range of
public input and engagement in formulating the comprehensive plan and inviting and
considering public review and comment. The intent of this subsection is to provide for the
broad dissemination of proposals and alternatives, opportunity for written comments, open
discussions, information dissemination and consideration of and response to public
comments and to ensure that public comment is a factor in the development of a
comprehensive plan as described in section 4326-A. The department shall provide
guidance on best practices for soliciting public input as part of the development of a
comprehensive plan.
Sec. 10. 30-A MRSA §4324, sub-§8, ¶B, as amended by PL 2003, c. 641, §8, is
further amended to read:
B. A copy of the proposed comprehensive plan must be made available for public
inspection at each municipal office or other convenient location with regular public
hours at least 30 days before the hearing and made available on the municipality's
publicly accessible website and by whatever means the municipality regularly
publishes that municipality's public information. If modification of the plan is
proposed pursuant to comments made at a public hearing, and if a follow-up public
hearing is to be held, the proposed changes must be made available for public
inspection at each municipal office or other convenient location with regular public
hours before any follow-up hearing.
Sec. 11. 30-A MRSA §4325, as amended by PL 2001, c. 578, §14, is further
amended to read:
§4325. Cooperative municipal growth management activities efforts
This section governs cooperative growth management efforts conducted by 2 or more
municipalities.
1. Within municipality. A municipality participating in cooperative growth
management efforts may exercise its land use planning and management authority over the
total land area within its jurisdiction.
2. Multimunicipal region. Any combination of municipalities may conduct joint
planning and regulatory programs to meet the requirements of this subchapter upon
adoption of a written comprehensive planning and enforcement agreement by the municipal
legislative bodies involved. The municipalities must agree:
A. On procedures for joint action in the preparation and adoption of comprehensive
plans, and whether land use regulations and other implementation measures to be
conducted on a multimunicipal basis will be administered within each municipality or
by 2 or more of the municipalities;
Page 9 - 132LR0289(01)

B. On the manner of representation on any such joint land use body; and
C. On the amount and source of contribution from each municipality for any costs
incurred in the development, implementation and enforcement of the comprehensive
plan and its implementation program and on the method of distributing the benefits or
impacts of regional land use, economic development, housing, transportation,
infrastructure and other shared plans and programs.
The comprehensive planning and enforcement agreement must be in writing, approved by
the municipal legislative bodies for each municipality and forwarded to the department.
3. Requirements. The comprehensive planning and enforcement agreement must be
in writing, approved by the municipal legislative bodies and forwarded to the office.
Sec. 12. 30-A MRSA §4326, as amended by PL 2023, c. 646, Pt. A, §§35 to 38, is
repealed.
Sec. 13. 30-A MRSA §4326-A is enacted to read:
§4326-A. Growth management program elements
A growth management program must include at least a comprehensive plan, as
described in subsections 1 to 5, including a timetable for the implementation program.
1. Inventory and mapping. A comprehensive plan must include:
A. Mapping of environmental systems data and other information important to making
land use decisions, which must include, but is not limited to, all critical natural
resources, all important natural resources and all data layers provided by the
Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife's mapping under the beginning with
habitat program as defined in section 4301, subsection 7-A, including those layers that
are subject to state and federal laws, rules and regulations intended to preserve natural
resources;
B. Mapping of conserved lands, identified using data and maps from federal and state
agencies, regional councils and relevant local sources, as applicable;
C. Identification of locally important farmland, agricultural soils, forest land, mineral
resources, working waterfronts, heritage coastal areas, scenic areas, public water
supplies, other lands and water important to the local or regional natural resource-based
economy and land in Maine tree growth, farmland and open space and working
waterfront protection tax programs in Title 36, chapter 105, subchapters 2-A, 10 and
10-A, respectively. As used in this paragraph, "heritage coastal areas" means areas
containing an assemblage of geological, botanical, zoological, historical or scenic
features of exceptional state or national significance; and
D. A climate vulnerability assessment or local climate action plan.
2. Designation and mapping. A comprehensive plan must designate, map and
describe:
A. Rural areas, including any critical rural areas deserving of protection from
unrestricted development, and open lands, including areas deserving additional
protections not provided by federal or state law, rule or regulation or local ordinance.
Within areas identified and mapped as rural areas or critical rural areas, the
comprehensive plan must identify any existing or proposed placetypes within these
Page 10 - 132LR0289(01)

413 rural and critical rural areas, including, but not limited to, placetypes described in
424 department rules such as rural centers, rural farmsteads, rural backlands, adjacent rural
435 lands or rural roads;
B. Suburban areas, which may include identification of areas of existing suburban
development, intended new suburban development or areas intended to transition from
suburban development to another placetype. Within areas mapped as suburban areas,
the comprehensive plan must identify any existing or proposed placetypes within these
suburban areas, which may include, but are not limited to, placetypes described in
department rules such as advanced suburban areas or suburban roads;
C. Areas or centers of existing or intended human and community activity, including
placetypes not identified in paragraph A or B that are described in department rules,
including existing or proposed downtowns, village centers, adjacent neighborhoods
and high-impact corridors; and
D. Growth areas, which are placetypes or portions of placetypes identified and mapped
pursuant to paragraph C, where investment by the municipality and the State may be
necessary to implement the comprehensive plan. Identification of designated growth
areas must be informed by and consistent with the needs analysis required by
subsection 3 and the goals established under subsection 4.
The municipality or multimunicipal region may identify as its growth areas one or more
growth areas adopted or to be adopted by one or more other municipalities or
multimunicipal regions in accordance with an interlocal agreement adopted in
accordance with chapter 115 with one or more municipalities or multimunicipal
regions.
A municipality or multimunicipal region is not required to identify growth areas within
the municipality or multimunicipal region for residential, commercial, industrial or
mixed-use growth if it demonstrates, in accordance with rules adopted by the
department pursuant to this article, that it is not possible to accommodate future
residential, commercial or industrial growth within the municipality or multimunicipal
region because of severe physical limitations, including, without limitation, the lack of
adequate water supply and sewage disposal services, very shallow soils or limitations
imposed by protected natural resources.
A municipality or multimunicipal region exercising the discretion afforded by this
paragraph to not identify growth areas shall review the basis for its demonstration
during the periodic revisions undertaken pursuant to section 4347‑A.
This subsection does not prohibit a municipality or a multimunicipal region from
identifying, describing or mapping placetypes not defined in this subchapter or in rules
adopted pursuant to this subchapter. A municipality or multimunicipal region may use
different names for placetypes defined in this subchapter or in rules adopted pursuant to
this subchapter in order to reflect local nomenclature or preferences.
3. Needs analysis. A comprehensive plan must include a needs analysis that identifies
existing conditions or desired conditions within the municipality or multimunicipal region
that are necessary to support housing, economic growth and development; protect public
health, safety and welfare of the community; and protect the environment and critical
resources.
Page 11 - 132LR0289(01)

For all areas identified under subsections 1 and 2, the comprehensive plan must identify
needs related to ensuring protection of critical natural resources, water quality and, as
applicable, access to coastal waters for commercial activities and protection of agricultural
and forest resources.
The comprehensive plan must include a narrative section describing the analysis conducted
pursuant to this section and how it informed the identification of each need listed in the
comprehensive plan. The narrative section must describe any public input received,
including public input received in response to solicitation of public comment pursuant to
section 4324, subsection 3, and how that input informed the identification of needs listed
in the comprehensive plan.
4. Goals. The comprehensive plan must include a narrative section that outlines the
goals the municipality or multimunicipal region has established to address each of the needs
identified under subsection 3. The narrative must describe how the municipality's or the
multimunicipal region's goals:
A. Address the needs identified pursuant to subsection 3;
B. Align with state goals listed in section 4312. The comprehensive plan must note if
a state goal is not applicable to the municipality or multimunicipal region; and
C. Align or, if applicable, conflict with the goals of the region.
5. Implementation strategy. The comprehensive plan must include a section that
describes how the goals established in subsection 4 will be implemented, including:
A. Identification of and a description of land use policies and land use ordinances to
be adopted in order to align with the maps created pursuant to this section where those
policies and ordinances are applicable;
B. For municipalities with zoning ordinances, establishment of development standards
applicable to implement the goals in subsection 4;
C. Plans for capital investment and, if feasible, identification of sources of capital; and
D. Establishment of the timetable for the implementation program.
Sec. 14. 30-A MRSA §4328, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 592, §2, is amended to read:
§4328. Transfer of development rights
In order to comply with the requirement in section 4326 4326-A for each municipality
to adopt land use policies and land use ordinances to discourage incompatible development,
a municipality may adopt a transfer of development rights program for the transfer of
development rights within its boundaries. Two or more municipalities may adopt a
program that provides for the transfer of development rights between the municipalities if
the municipalities have entered into an interlocal agreement pursuant to chapter 115 for
this purpose.
Sec. 15. 30-A MRSA §4346, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 590, Pt. A, §10, is
further amended to read:
The department may enter into financial assistance grants only to the extent that funds
are available. In making grants, the department shall consider the need for planning in a
municipality or multimunicipal region, the proximity of the municipality or multimunicipal
Page 12 - 132LR0289(01)

412 region to other areas that are conducting or have completed the planning process and the
423 economic and geographic role of the municipality or multimunicipal region within a
434 regional context. The department shall give priority in making grants to any municipality
445 or multimunicipal region that has adopted a local climate action plan and, if the
456 municipality or multimunicipal region has adopted a comprehensive plan or growth
467 management program, prepared a climate vulnerability assessment pursuant to section
478 4326, subsection 1, paragraph L. The department may consider other criteria in making
489 grants, as long as the criteria support the goal of encouraging and facilitating the adoption
590 and implementation of local and multimunicipal growth management programs consistent
1501 with the procedures, goals, requirements and guidelines established in this subchapter. In
1512 order to maximize the availability of the technical and financial assistance program to all
1523 municipalities, multimunicipal regions and regional councils, financial assistance programs
1534 administered competitively under this article are exempt from rules adopted by the
1545 Department of Administrative and Financial Services pursuant to Title 5, section 1825‑C
1556 for use in the purchase of services and the awarding of grants and contracts. The
1567 department shall publish a program statement describing its grant program and advertising
1578 its availability to eligible applicants.
Sec. 16. 30-A MRSA §4346, sub-§5, as amended by PL 2013, c. 300, §6, is further
amended to read:
5. Coordination. State agencies with regulatory or other authority affecting the goals
established in this subchapter shall conduct their respective activities in a manner consistent
with the goals established under this subchapter, including, but not limited to, coordinating
with municipalities, regional councils and other state agencies in meeting the state goals;
providing available information to regions and municipalities as described in section 4326,
subsection 1 the department, municipalities and multimunicipal regions; cooperating with
efforts to integrate and provide access to the department with geographic information and
environmental system data and maps necessary for the inventory and needs analysis
components of a comprehensive plan pursuant to section 4326-A; making state investments
and awarding grant money as described in section 4349‑A; and conducting reviews of
growth management programs as provided in section 4347‑A, subsection 3, paragraph A.
Without limiting the application of this section to other state agencies, the following
agencies shall comply with this subchapter:
B. Department of Economic and Community Development;
C. Department of Environmental Protection;
D. Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry;
E. Department of Inland Fisheries and Wildlife;
F. Department of Marine Resources;
G. Department of Transportation;
G-1. Department of Health and Human Services;
H. Finance Authority of Maine; and
I. Maine State Housing Authority.
Sec. 17. 30-A MRSA §4347-A, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§21 and affected by §41, is further amended to read:
Page 13 - 132LR0289(01)

1. Comprehensive plans. A municipality or multimunicipal region that chooses to
prepare a growth management program and receives a planning grant under this article
shall submit its comprehensive plan to the department for review. A municipality or
multimunicipal region that chooses to prepare a growth management program without
receiving a planning grant under this article may submit its comprehensive plan to the
department for review. The department shall review plans for consistency with the
procedures, goals and guidelines requirements established in this subchapter. A contract
for a planning assistance grant must include specific timetables governing the review of the
comprehensive plan by the department. A comprehensive plan submitted for review more
than 12 months following a contract end date may be required to contain data, projections
and other time-sensitive portions of the plan or program that are in compliance with the
department's most current review standards.
Sec. 18. 30-A MRSA §4347-A, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§21 and affected by §41, is further amended to read:
2. Growth management programs. A municipality or multimunicipal region may at
any time request a certificate of consistency for its growth management program.
A. Upon a request for review under this section, the department shall review the
program and determine whether the program is consistent with the procedures, goals
and guidelines requirements established in this subchapter.
B. Certification by the former State Planning Office or the department of a
municipality's or multimunicipal region's growth management program by the former
State Planning Office or the department charged with reviewing growth management
programs under this article is valid for 10 12 years. To maintain certification, a
municipality or multimunicipal region shall periodically review its growth
management program and submit to the department in a timely manner any revisions
necessary to account for changes, including changes caused by growth and
development. Certification does not lapse in any year in which the Legislature does not
appropriate funds to the department for the purposes of reviewing programs for
recertification.
C. Upon a request for review under this section, the department may review rate of
growth, impact fee and zoning ordinances to determine whether the ordinances are
consistent with a comprehensive plan that has been found consistent under this section
without requiring submission of all elements of a growth management program. An
affirmative finding of consistency by the department is required for a municipality or
multimunicipal region to assert jurisdiction as provided in section 4349‑A.
Sec. 19. 30-A MRSA §4347-A, sub-§3, ¶C, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt.
JJ, §21 and affected by §41, is further amended to read:
C. Within 90 days after receiving the growth management program, send all written
comments on the growth management program to the municipality or multimunicipal
region and any applicable regional council. If warranted, the department shall issue
findings specifically describing how the submitted growth management program is not
consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines requirements established in this
subchapter and the recommended measures for remedying the deficiencies.
Page 14 - 132LR0289(01)

(1) In its findings, the department shall clearly indicate its position on any point
on which there are significant conflicts among the written comments submitted to
the department.
(2) If the department finds that the growth management program was adopted in
accordance with the procedures, goals and guidelines requirements established in
this subchapter, the department shall issue a certificate of consistency for the
growth management program.
(3) Notwithstanding paragraph D, if a municipality or multimunicipal region
requests a certificate of consistency for its growth management program, any
unmodified component of that program that has previously been reviewed by the
former State Planning Office or the department and has received a finding of
consistency will retain that finding during program certification review by the
department as long as the finding of consistency is current as defined in rules
adopted by the department;
Sec. 20. 30-A MRSA §4347-A, sub-§3-A, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt. JJ,
§21 and affected by §41, is further amended to read:
3-A. Review of comprehensive plan. In reviewing a comprehensive plan, the
department shall:
A. Solicit written comments on any proposed comprehensive plan from regional
councils, state agencies, all municipalities contiguous to the municipality or
multimunicipal region submitting a comprehensive plan and any interested residents
of the municipality or multimunicipal region or of contiguous municipalities. The
comment period extends for 25 20 business days after the department receives the
comprehensive plan. Each state agency reviewing the proposal shall designate a person
or persons responsible for coordinating the agency's review of the comprehensive plan;
B. Prepare all written comments from all sources in a form to be forwarded to the
municipality or multimunicipal region;
C. Within 35 40 business days after receiving the comprehensive plan, notify the
municipality or multimunicipal region if the plan is complete for purposes of review.
If the department notifies the municipality or multimunicipal region that the plan is not
complete for purposes of review, the department shall indicate in its notice necessary
additional data or information make a determination of whether a plan is consistent or
inconsistent based on a review of the requirements of this subchapter;
D. Within 10 business days of issuing notification that a comprehensive plan is
complete for purposes of review, issue findings specifically describing whether the
submitted plan is consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in
this subchapter and identify which inconsistencies in the plan, if any, may directly
affect rate of growth, zoning or impact fee ordinances.
(1) In its findings, the department shall clearly indicate its position on any point
on which there are significant conflicts among the written comments submitted to
the department.
(2) If the department finds that the comprehensive plan was developed in
accordance with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in this
Page 15 - 132LR0289(01)

414 subchapter, the department shall issue a finding of consistency for the
425 comprehensive plan.
(3) A finding of inconsistency must identify the goals under this subchapter not
adequately addressed, specific sections of the rules relating to comprehensive plan
review adopted by the department not adequately addressed and recommendations
for resolving the inconsistency;
D-1. If the department finds that a comprehensive plan was developed in accordance
with the goals, requirements and guidelines established in this subchapter, issue a
finding of consistency for the comprehensive plan. If the department finds that a
comprehensive plan does not meet the requirements established in this subchapter, the
department shall issue a finding of inconsistency and provide to the municipality or
multimunicipal region recommendations for resolving the inconsistency;
E. Send all written findings and comments on the comprehensive plan to the
municipality or multimunicipal region and any applicable regional council; and
F. Provide ample opportunity for the municipality or multimunicipal region submitting
a comprehensive plan to respond to and correct any identified deficiencies in the plan
revise the plan to be consistent with the goals and requirements of this subchapter. A
finding of inconsistency for a comprehensive plan may be addressed within 24 months
of the date of the finding without addressing any new review standards that are created
during that time interval. After 24 months, the plan must be resubmitted in its entirety
for state review under the department's most current review standards.
If the department finds that a plan is not consistent with the procedures, goals and
guidelines requirements established in this subchapter, and in the rules and guidance
adopted and established by the department, the municipality or multimunicipal district
region that submitted the plan may appeal that finding to the department within 20 business
days of receipt of the finding in accordance with rules adopted by the department, which
are routine technical rules pursuant to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
The department's decision on consistency of a comprehensive plan constitutes final agency
action.
A finding by the department pursuant to paragraph D D-1 that a comprehensive plan is
consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines requirements established in this
subchapter is valid for 12 years from the date of its issuance. A finding by the former State
Planning Office issued pursuant to this subchapter prior to December 31, 2000 that a
comprehensive plan is consistent with the procedures, goals and guidelines established in
this subchapter is valid until December 31, 2012. For purposes of section 4314, subsection
3 and section 4352, subsection 2, expiration of a finding of consistency pursuant to this
subsection does not itself make a comprehensive plan inconsistent with the procedures,
goals and guidelines established in this subchapter.
Sec. 21. 30-A MRSA §4352, sub-§6, as amended by PL 2003, c. 688, Pt. C, §20,
is further amended to read:
6. Effect on State. A zoning ordinance that is not consistent with a comprehensive
plan that is consistent with the provisions of section 4326 4326-A is advisory with respect
to the State. Except as provided in this section, a state agency shall comply with a zoning
ordinance consistent with a comprehensive plan that is consistent with the provisions of
Page 16 - 132LR0289(01)

415 section 4326 4326-A in seeking to develop any building, parking facility or other publicly
426 owned structure. The Governor or the Governor's designee may, after public notice and
437 opportunity for public comment, including written notice to the municipal officers, waive
448 any use restrictions in those ordinances upon finding that:
A. The proposed use is not allowed anywhere in the municipality;
B. There are no reasonable alternative sites for or configurations of the project within
the municipality that would achieve the necessary public purposes;
C. There are no reasonable alternatives to the project, including sites in other
municipalities, that would achieve the necessary public purposes;
D. The project will result in public benefits beyond the limits of the municipality,
including, without limitation, access to public waters or publicly owned lands; and
E. The project is necessary to protect the public health, welfare or environment.
A decision to waive a restriction under this section may be appealed by the municipality or
any aggrieved party to Superior Court.
Sec. 22. 30-A MRSA §5953-D, sub-§3, ¶D, as amended by PL 2011, c. 655, Pt.
JJ, §27 and affected by §41 and amended by c. 657, Pt. W, §5, is further amended by
amending subparagraph (2), division (a) to read:
(a) Has adopted a comprehensive plan that is determined by the Executive
Department, former State Planning Office or the Department of Agriculture,
Conservation and Forestry the Maine Office of Community Affairs,
established in Title 5, section 3202, to be consistent with section 4326,
subsections 1 to 4 4326-A.
Sec. 23. 30-A MRSA §5953-D, sub-§4-A, as amended by PL 2003, c. 288, §3, is
further amended to read:
4-A. Criteria; conditions for downtown improvement grants or loans. The
Department of Economic and Community Development, in conjunction with the bank,
shall develop criteria and conditions for the award of downtown improvement grants or
loans to eligible municipalities after consultation with the state agencies listed in subsection
5 and subject to the requirements of this section. The department shall establish a
preference for municipalities that are regional service centers or urban compact
municipalities or have adopted a comprehensive plan consistent with section 4326 4326-A.
Sec. 24. Office to adopt rules. The Maine Office of Community Affairs,
established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 3202, shall amend existing rules
governing the growth management program to be consistent with the laws governing the
program as amended by this Act. Notwithstanding Title 30-A, section 4312, subsection 4,
rules adopted pursuant to this section are major substantive rules as defined in Title 5,
chapter 375, subchapter 2-A. The following placetype descriptions must be incorporated
into the rules.
1. Adjacent neighborhood. "Adjacent neighborhood" means a primarily residential
area located adjacent to a village center, downtown or high-impact corridor. Adjacent
neighborhoods are predominantly developed for residential activities and are typically
arranged along a network of interconnected streets.
Page 17 - 132LR0289(01)

2. Adjacent rural lands. "Adjacent rural lands" means large undeveloped land areas
adjacent to rural backlands and to areas where there is development activity. Adjacent rural
lands typically include land located behind lots along rural roads or adjacent to a rural
center, village center or other placetype. Adjacent rural lands can also be located adjacent
to suburban areas. Because of their proximity to land where development is present,
adjacent rural lands are a high priority for local planning and policy work to verify goals
for future land use.
3. Advanced suburban area. "Advanced suburban area" means an area where low-
density development has spread from the road frontage deeper into lots and to adjacent
rural land. Development within these areas is typically segregated by use and may include
commercial strip malls, regional shopping centers, so-called big box retail development,
office parks, residential subdivisions and other forms of single-use development.
Advanced suburban areas result in disconnected development and fragmented open spaces
disconnected from a larger network of habitat corridors, trails and other natural systems.
4. Rural backlands. "Rural backlands" means geographically isolated areas with no
direct frontage onto public roads. Rural backlands often have very little or no development
and may be intersected by trails and utility corridors. These areas may contain conserved
lands, critical natural resources and important natural resources. Depending on local
municipal land use policies, rural backlands may be targeted for conservation, as working
lands, or for development that limits impacts on wildlife, water management, agricultural
uses and active outdoor recreation activities.
5. Rural center. "Rural center" means an area with a grouping of 2 or more buildings
that have formed a center of community within a rural area. It may include historic or
architecturally important or significant buildings. A rural center can vary in size but is
geographically smaller in size than a village center placetype.
6. Rural farmstead. "Rural farmstead" means a parcel of land that serves or has the
potential to serve as a mixed-use, resource-based economic center of activity in a rural area.
A rural farmstead may consist of adjacent buildings on a single parcel that support the
commercial, residential and economic needs of a rural agricultural or forestry business. A
rural farmstead allows for mixed-use development in rural areas to provide economic
options to rural landowners while also safeguarding the agricultural and forest sectors from
fragmented low-density development.
7. Rural road. "Rural road" means a road that has the characteristics of a rural area,
with homes and businesses occurring at infrequent intervals on lots that often exceed 5
acres in size, and are frequently much larger, with driveways that typically occur an average
of every 500 feet or more. Rural roads have no geographic center, except where punctuated
by rural centers.
8. Suburban road. "Suburban road" means an area along the frontage of a road where
incremental development slowly transitions a rural road to a suburban one. Suburban roads
have more frequent curb cuts than a rural road, typically occurring an average of every 500
feet or less. Buildings are typically located on lots of one to 3 acres, created through lot
splits and subdivisions of larger parcels of land. Development typically includes a range
of uses, including residential, commercial, industrial and office uses, each separated from
the other. Buildings are typically located within view of the road and each other, changing
the perception of the area from rural to suburban.
Page 18 - 132LR0289(01)

9. Village center. "Village center" means an area with a loose grouping of buildings
accommodating a variety of uses and serving as a center for commerce, living, education
and social interaction within a community. Village centers typically include a loose
network of streets, with a main street running through the center. The placement of
buildings on lots, the distance between buildings and the pattern of streets and blocks are
looser and more irregular than a downtown placetype.
Sec. 25. Director to convene stakeholder group. Prior to initiating rulemaking
as required by this Act, the Director of the Maine Office of Community Affairs shall
convene a stakeholder group for the purpose of soliciting input on the development of rules
necessary to implement the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2,
as amended by this Act. The stakeholder group may not exceed 17 members, excluding
the director. Members of the stakeholder group are as follows:
1. The Director of the Maine Office of Community Affairs;
2. The program director of the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and Forestry's
Municipal Planning Assistance Program;
3. A representative of the Housing Opportunity Program established in Title 5, section
13056-J, as designated by the program's director;
4. A representative of the climate resilience program, as designated by the program's
director;
5. A representative of the Office of Policy Innovation and the Future with expertise in
housing, as designated by the director of that office;
6. The director of the Maine State Housing Authority or the director's designee; and
7. The following members, selected by and serving at the pleasure of the Director of
the Maine Office of Community Affairs:
A. A representative of a statewide association of municipalities;
B. A representative of a statewide organization that advocates for farmland protection
and farm viability;
C. A representative of a statewide organization that advocates for smart growth;
D. A representative of a statewide organization that represents land use planners;
E. A representative of a statewide organization that advocates for conservation of
wildlife and wildlife habitat in this State;
F. A representative of a statewide organization that advocates for the creation and
preservation of affordable housing;
G. A representative of a statewide organization that advocates for responsible
development and ownership of real estate;
H. Representatives from at least 3 municipalities of varying populations; at least one
of whom must be from a municipality that has completed a comprehensive plan that
incorporates placetypes; and
I. Representatives from at least 2 regional councils as established under Title 30-A,
chapter 119, subchapter 1.
Page 19 - 132LR0289(01)

Sec. 26. Office to develop guidance for public participation. The Maine
Office of Community Affairs shall develop guidance materials describing strategies for
soliciting, encouraging and incorporating public input into the development of a
comprehensive plan as required by the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4324,
subsection 3. At a minimum, the guidance materials must include:
1. Strategies to solicit input from all demographic groups of residents, including
historically underrepresented persons, through a series of public events and activities,
including hands-on workshops, work sessions or focused roundtable meetings;
2. Effective methods to advertise events and activities through a combination of print
and digital platforms in advance of the events and activities;
3. Multiple methods to provide opportunities for the public to contribute ideas, discuss
key issues facing the community, set priorities and develop policies and strategies to
address local challenges, including, but not limited to, seeking input through digital and
paper surveys, questionnaires, visual preference surveys and other means;
4. Methods to analyze the public input and use the input to prepare a draft of the
comprehensive plan and meet the requirements for a comprehensive plan under Title 30-A,
section 4326-A; and
5. Ways to make a draft comprehensive plan easily accessible to the public to solicit
feedback from the public on the draft comprehensive plan.
Sec. 27. Application. This Act does not apply to a comprehensive plan or growth
management program under the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 30-A, section 4314,
subsection 1 that was submitted to the Department of Agriculture, Conservation and
Forestry for certification before the final adoption of rules necessary to implement Title
30-A, chapter 187, subchapter 2 as authorized by Title 30-A, section 4312 and affected by
section 24 of this Act.